Massachusetts, session 194th, H2925.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 31 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(q) The executive office for administration and finance shall be directed to appropriately
fund the human resource division’s civil service unit such that the civil service unit may maintain
a budget to permit it to continue to provide an independent and objective process of resolving
appeals and disputes, and also better advertise, communicate, and market opportunities for
careers in public service.
of 1